Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
24-11-818. Benefits — Voluntary retirement.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, the term “salary” shall mean recurring pays that are received for the firefighter's regularly scheduled workweek and shall not include, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, payments for unused accrued sick leave or annual leave or the cash value of any nonrecurring or unusual remunerations.

The term “salary” may include the payments to a firefighter for unused accrued sick leave not to exceed ninety (90) workdays recorded on the records of the city or town as of the firefighter's date of retirement, provided the municipality agrees by ordinance to make adequate contributions to the fund to cover the additional costs for the benefits from the increased salary, and the fund is judged by an actuarial determination to be actuarially sound.

The board of trustees shall determine the actuarial costs of the payments for the unused accrued sick leave to the fund.

Any pension fund member who has served in a fire department in the State of Arkansas for a period of twenty (20) years or more, the last five (5) years of which shall have been consecutive, shall be entitled to be retired and receive from the fund a monthly pension equal to one-half (½) of the salary attached to the rank he or she held as a volunteer, part-paid, or full-paid member.

Any firefighter who shall have completed the period of service as provided for in this section shall receive from the board a certificate showing that he or she has completed the term of service required and is entitled to participate in all the benefits provided for in this act upon compliance with, and subject to, all the other terms and conditions of this act, whether he or she severs his or her connections or continues in service at the expiration of the time as set out in subdivision (a)(2) of this section. The right to participate in the fund shall become a vested right and shall not be lost by the termination of his or her services with or without cause.

Any full-paid firefighter who is already retired shall not receive less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per month.

Any full-paid firefighter who has more than twenty (20) years of service at the time of retirement shall be entitled to receive the sum of twenty dollars ($20.00) per month in addition to his or her regular retirement pay for each full year worked over and above twenty (20) years.

In no instance shall he or she receive more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month in addition to his or her regular benefits.

A volunteer or part-paid firefighter who has more than twenty (20) years of service at the time of retirement shall be entitled to receive the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) per month in addition to his or her regular retirement pay for each full year worked over and above twenty (20) years.

In no instance shall he or she receive more than fifty dollars ($50.00) per month in addition to his or her regular benefits.

The increase in benefit levels provided in this subsection for service beyond twenty (20) years shall apply only to those firefighters who retire on or after January 1, 1987, and, notwithstanding the provisions of § 24-11-826, may exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final salary.

A volunteer or part-paid firefighter who becomes a full-paid member of his or her fire department shall be eligible to retire as a full-paid member only if he or she shall have been employed as a full-paid member for a period of at least five (5) years immediately prior to his or her retirement.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “compensation” shall not include:

Any money received by the retired firefighter for replacement of personal clothing or equipment destroyed during the performance of active service to a fire department; or

Any expenditures by a municipality, as determined on a case-by-case basis, on behalf of the retired firefighter for hospitalization insurance benefits.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section or any other law to the contrary, a person retired from the service of a fire department may remain actively involved in the fire department, provided the person does not receive compensation for the service provided.

Service to a fire department under subdivision (f)(2) of this section shall not cause any suspension of retirement benefits payable under § 24-11-801 et seq., nor shall such service be interpreted by any board administering funds under this subchapter as a reinstatement of employment in a fire department.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 7740; Acts 1943, No. 167, § 2; 1953, No. 68, § 1; 1955, No. 77, § 1; 1957, No. 265, § 1; 1967, No. 233, § 1; 1983, No. 611, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2204; Acts 1987, No. 389, § 1; 1987, No. 396, § 1; 1987, No. 797, § 1; 1989, No. 182, §§ 1-3; 1993, No. 546, § 3; 1993, No. 1197, § 3; 1999, No. 901, § 1; 1999, No. 1114, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 27.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1197, § 6, provided:

“The increased benefits provided for under the provisions of this act shall only be paid provided the retirement funds are actuarially sound after the increase as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “firefighter” for “fire fighter” and “firefighter's” for “fire fighter's” throughout the section; substituted “that” for “which” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “A volunteer” for “Any volunteer” in (d)(1)(B)(i).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.

24-11-819. Benefits — Disability retirement.

Any firefighter who becomes totally and permanently physically or mentally incapacitated for any suitable duty as an employee as a result of personal injury or disease may be retired by the board, upon written application filed by or on behalf of the member, if, after medical examination of the member made by or under the direction of a physician designated by the board, the physician reports in writing that the member is physically or mentally totally incapacitated for the further performance of any suitable duty, that the incapacity will probably be permanent, and that the firefighter should be retired.

The benefit amount shall be as follows:

If the disabling injury or disease occurred while not actually performing work in gainful employment for the fire department, the monthly benefit shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants; or

For a full-paid firefighter who is injured in the line of duty, the monthly disability benefit shall either be equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of the salary attached to the rank held by the member in the fire department or shall be equal to the benefit paid to normal service retirants, whichever is greater.

For purposes of this section, “injured in the line of duty” means a disabling injury or disease that occurs while conducting official fire department operations or while in training to become a firefighter.

The board shall determine whether the disability occurred in the line of duty and may require any medical evidence, official reports, expert testimony, or other information to be supplied by the applicant in addition to the required physician's examination and report.

The additional benefits provided in this section shall be effective for all qualifying applications first received by the board on or after January 1, 1987, except that the board of trustees of any municipal firemen's relief and pension fund or of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System may increase the benefits for any disabled firefighter injured in the line of duty before January 1, 1987, but after January 1, 1983, if the board adopts a resolution to extend the benefit retroactively to those firefighters and if the fund will remain actuarially sound as determined by an actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board or the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

The disability benefit provided in this section shall continue to be paid to the firefighter so long as he or she is retired and shall not be reduced to the regular service annuity amount, if less, when the retirant reaches the normal retirement age.

Upon the death of the retirant, any survivor benefits shall be based upon the annuity amount received by the member at the time of his or her death, excepting any amount payable under § 24-11-826.

For purposes of computing all benefits, “salary” means recurring pays which are received for a regularly scheduled workweek and shall not include payments for unused accrued sick leave or annual leave or the cash value of any nonrecurring or unusual remunerations.

Any disability benefit approved under this section shall be effective the first day of the calendar month next following the latter of either the firefighter's termination of active membership or six (6) months before the date the written application was filed with the board.

In the event that a firefighter's disability ceases, his or her benefit shall also cease, and he or she shall be returned to active service at not less than the same salary he or she received at the time of his or her retirement.

No person shall be retired as provided in this section or receive any pension from the fund unless there shall be filed with the board certificates of his or her disability. The certificates shall be subscribed and sworn to by the person and by the city or town physician, if there is one, and by the firemen's relief and pension fund physician.

The board may require other evidence of disability before ordering the retirement and payment as provided in this section.

At least one (1) time each year during the first five (5) years, or as often as required by the board following a member's retirement for disability and at least one (1) time each three (3) years thereafter, the board may require any disability retirant who has not attained the normal retirement age to undergo a medical examination by or under the direction of a physician or physicians designated by the board.

If the retirant refuses to submit to the medical examination in any period, his or her disability annuity may be suspended by the board until he or she complies with the provisions of this section.

If his or her refusal continues for one (1) year, all his or her rights in and to a disability annuity may be revoked by the board.

If, upon such medical examination of the retirant, the physician reports to the board that the retirant is physically and mentally able and capable of resuming suitable duty as an employee, his or her disability retirement shall terminate.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, §§ 5-7, 9; Pope's Dig., §§ 7741-7743, 7745; Acts 1955, No. 76, § 1; 1957, No. 95, § 1; 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 24, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2205–19-2207, 19-2209; Acts 1987, No. 325, § 1; 1989, No. 375, § 1; 1989, No. 390, § 1; 1989, No. 391, § 1; 1991, No. 391, § 1; 1991, No. 844, § 1; 2001, No. 1806, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 28.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “firefighter” for “fire fighter,” “firefighter's” for “fire fighter's” and “firefighters” for “fire fighters” throughout the section; and rewrote (a)(2)(B)(iv).

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1806, § 2, provided:

“This act applies retroactively to authorize the board of trustees of the Local Police and Fire Retirement System or of any municipal firemen's pension and relief fund which will remain actuarially sound to allow a fire fighter who was disabled from an injury in the line of duty after January 1, 1983, but before January 1, 1987, to receive the benefit of sixty-five percent (65%) of the salary attached to his rank, except that benefit payments shall not be made retroactive to the effective date of the fire fighter's disability.”

24-11-820. Benefits — Death of active or retired member other than while employed outside department.

Whenever any member of a fire department of any city, town, or fire improvement district covered by this act shall have lost his or her life, except while actually performing work in gainful employment outside the fire department, or any retired member shall die, leaving a spouse or children under nineteen (19) years of age, then, upon satisfactory proof of those facts made to it, the board of trustees shall order and direct, in the case of volunteer or part-paid firefighters, that a monthly pension equal to the amount of the pension or retirement pay attached to the rank of the member of the fire department at the time of his or her death shall be paid for life to the spouse. The monthly pension shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100).

In the case of full-paid firefighters' classifications, a monthly pension shall be paid for life to the spouse in the amount of the pension received by the retired firefighter at the time of his or her death, or the amount of the pension to which the member would have been entitled on the day he or she died had he or she been retired, but in no event shall the benefit of the spouse be less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per month, regardless of whether:

The spouse has already been receiving pension payments; and

The firefighter was on active duty or retired.

In addition to the monthly pension provided in subsection (a) of this section, the board of trustees may order and direct the payment of, in the case of volunteer or part-paid firefighters, the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month for each child under nineteen (19) years of age who has not completed high school and, in the case of full-paid firefighters, the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per month for each child under nineteen (19) years of age who has not completed high school.

However, if the child enrolls in an institution of higher education after completing high school, the payments shall continue as long as the child is a full-time student, but in no instance beyond the child's twenty-third birthday.

If there is no eligible spouse at the time of the member's death, then the total sums shall be paid to his or her children until they shall have reached nineteen (19) years of age or until the children have completed high school, whichever occurs first.

However, if a child enrolls in an institution of higher education after completing high school, the payments shall continue as long as the child is a full-time student, but in no instance beyond the child's twenty-third birthday.

The sum total of the pension to be paid the spouse or the qualifying child or children of volunteer or part-paid firefighters shall not exceed one-half (½) of the salary attached to the rank the member held at the time of his or her death as an active member of a volunteer or part-paid fire department, nor shall it be less than one hundred dollars ($100) per month.

However, the limit on the sum total amount under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section may be exceeded through the benefit increases authorized under § 24-11-102.

If any spouse or child shall marry, he or she shall thereafter receive no further pension under this subchapter. However, if he or she is a surviving spouse of a firefighter who is killed while in the official performance of his or her duties, then that surviving spouse’s benefits may be restored to the spouse whose benefits had been terminated before or after August 1, 1997, upon his or her application to and approval by the board of trustees.

The benefit restored under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section may include retroactive benefit increases to the last amount received by the surviving spouse upon approval of the board of trustees after obtaining results of an actuarial study to determine its effect on the fund. The benefit restoration shall not include any retroactive lump-sum payment.

If any retired firefighter shall marry after his or her retirement, the surviving spouse may be entitled to a pension under this subchapter if:

He or she has been married to the firefighter for a period of at least five (5) years and the marriage occurred within five (5) years of the retirement date;

The board of trustees for the fund decides to extend this benefit for its members; and

The pension fund will be actuarially sound as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board after this benefit increase is extended to members.

In computing service required under this section for eligibility to participate in benefits, service shall be computed from the day the person from whom benefits are derived was duly appointed and enrolled in some fire department in the State of Arkansas as a firefighter, and the service shall be considered in determining eligibility for benefits regardless of whether it was performed before or after the passage of §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820.

It is the intention of this act that all spouses and dependent children of full-paid, part-paid, and volunteer firefighters shall receive at least the minimum benefits prescribed in this section, regardless of whether the service upon which the spouses or dependent children derived the benefit was performed before or after the passage of §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820.

Any payment of benefits above the minimum amounts stated in this section shall not be made except upon determination that the fund will remain actuarially sound.

It is the intention of this section to make eligible for benefits the spouses and dependent children of members who died from illness after leaving active service or who died after being retired for a duty-related injury, as described in this section, regardless if the service, retirement, or death occurred before or after the passage of this section.

However, payment to survivors made eligible by this section shall not be made retroactively but shall begin with the passage of this section.

If a retirant and, if any, his or her eligible beneficiary both die before they have received in annuity payments a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions, including any interest credits, standing to the retirant's credit in the system at the time of his or her retirement, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the total amount of annuities received by them shall be paid to such person or persons as the retirant shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.

If no designated person survives the retirant and his or her beneficiary, the difference shall be paid to the estate of the survivor of the retirant and his or her beneficiary.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 491, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 7744; Acts 1943, No. 167, § 3; 1953, No. 68, § 2; 1955, No. 77, § 2; 1957, No. 94, § 1; 1969, No. 69, § 1; 1981, No. 253, § 1; 1983, No. 48, § 1; 1983, No. 397, §§ 1, 3; 1985, No. 145, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-2208, 19-2208n, 19-2208.1; Acts 1989, No. 821, § 9; 1993, No. 1197, § 4; 1997, No. 536, § 1; 2003, No. 674, § 2; 2003, No. 1278, § 1; 2005, No. 1921, § 1; 2007, No. 614, § 1; 2013, No. 520, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1197, § 6, provided:

“The increased benefits provided for under the provisions of this act shall only be paid provided the retirement funds are actuarially sound after the increase as determined by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.”

Acts 1997, No. 695, § 1, codified as § 24-10-617, provided:

“(a)

When a municipal employee who is vested in a municipal retirement system under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, § 24-10-101, et seq., or under a local police pension and relief fund, § 24-11-401, et seq., or under a fire pension and relief fund, § 24-11-801, et seq., is killed or dies in the course of his employment and is survived by a spouse, or has surviving dependents actively drawing a benefit from those municipal retirement systems, then the surviving spouse or surviving dependents may continue to participate in the municipality's health care plan as long as the surviving spouse or surviving dependents pay both employer and employee contributions to the health care plan.

“(b)

Provided, however, a surviving spouse or surviving dependent may qualify to continue on the health care plan only so long as they remain an eligible beneficiaries under the retirement system.”

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this section,” which first appeared in the 1985 amendment, Acts 1985, No. 145 was signed by the Governor and became effective on February 18, 1985.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added “and the marriage occurred within five (5) years of the retirement date” to the end of (b)(5)A).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-11-801.

Cross References.

Applicability of this section, § 24-11-832.

24-11-821. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning benefits and cessation of payments, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 41, § 29. The section was derived from Acts 1921, No. 491, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 7746; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2210.

24-11-822. Benefits — Payments upon death of retirant or beneficiary.

If a retirant and his or her eligible beneficiary, if any, of a local firemen's relief and pension fund authorized by this subchapter, both die before they have received in annuity payments a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions, including any interest credits standing to the retirant's credit in the system at the time of his or her retirement, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the total amount of annuities received by them shall be paid to the estate of the retirant or the estate of the retirant's beneficiary.

If the retirant or the retirant's beneficiary dies intestate, the difference shall be paid to the heirs of the retirant or the retirant's beneficiary according to the Arkansas laws of descent and distribution, § 28-9-201 et seq., without regard to the residence of the retirant or the retirant's beneficiary at the time of death upon submission of sufficient proof of heirship to the board.

If an active member dies and does not leave a beneficiary entitled to an annuity payment, the difference between the accumulated contributions, including any interest credits standing to the member's credit in the system at the time of his or her death, and the total amount of annuities received by him or her shall be paid to the estate of the member, or if the member dies intestate, shall be distributed to his or her heirs according to the Arkansas laws of descent and distribution, § 28-9-201 et seq., without regard to the residence of the member at the time of his or her death upon submission of sufficient proof of heirship to the board.

The payments shall be made by the board in accordance with the order of the circuit court in cases involving an estate or directly to those authorized to receive payments according to the Arkansas laws of descent and distribution in cases of intestacy.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 409, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Former § 24-11-822, concerning increase in benefits generally, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 279, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 951, § 1; 1983, No. 505, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2233.

Acts 1989, No. 409, § 2, provided:

“The provisions of this act shall be retroactive to January 1, 1988. The Board of Trustees of any fund hereunder is hereby directed to refund any accumulated contributions to the proper estate or heirs which would have been payable had the provisions of this act been in full force and effect since January 1, 1988 for any death occurring subsequent to that date.”

24-11-823. Increase in benefits for certain persons retired due to total permanent disability.

The board of trustees of any municipal firemen's relief and pension fund may increase benefits to persons who have retired or may retire from the fire department of the municipality because of total and permanent disability and who qualify or may qualify for monthly benefits of less than five hundred dollars ($500).

The benefits of any such person shall not be increased to more than five hundred dollars ($500) per month, and the increase shall be subject to the following conditions:

The board of trustees shall adopt a resolution approved by not less than three-fourths (¾) of the membership of the board outlining the proposed increase in benefits;

The board shall obtain an actuarial valuation by an actuary stating that the fund will continue to be actuarially sound notwithstanding the effects of the resolution; and

A copy of the resolution adopted by the board and a copy of the actuarial valuation approving the resolution shall be filed with the circuit clerk of the county in which the fire department is located, with the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, and, if the fire department is located within the incorporated boundaries of a city, with the city clerk of that city.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 619, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2233.1; Acts 2013, No. 41, § 30.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “actuarial valuation” for “evaluation” in (b)(2); and in (b)(3), substituted “valuation” for “evaluation” and “in which” for “wherein.”

24-11-824. Fire protection districts.

Any fire protection district in this state formed pursuant to §§ 14-284-101 — 14-284-121 and maintaining a fire department within that district is eligible to establish by resolution of the board of commissioners of the district a firemen's relief and pension fund covering the employees of that fire department.

The board of commissioners of the district together with the chief of the fire department of the district shall constitute the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund of the district and shall designate the beneficiaries thereof in the same manner and with the same qualifications as specified in this subchapter for the designation of beneficiaries of firemen's relief and pension funds in cities and towns of this state.

The boards of trustees of firemen's relief and pension funds established pursuant to this section shall be operated in the same manner, have the same powers, and be subject to the same limitations imposed on, and granted to, those boards of trustees of firemen's relief and pension funds established by this subchapter.

In addition to the funds provided by § 24-11-809 from insurance premium taxes, there shall also be added the following moneys:

All money given or donated to the fund; and

Six percent (6%) of the monthly salary of each full-paid firefighter and each part-paid firefighter of the department, to be deducted each month by the district and immediately paid to the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund.

However, in the event of resignation or discharge from the fire department of any member thereof, all money deducted from his or her salary shall be immediately returned to him or her without interest.

In the event the fire protection district maintaining a firemen's relief and pension fund pursuant to this section should be merged with, and become a part of, any city or town of this state having a firemen's relief and pension fund pursuant to this subchapter, the fund of the district shall be merged into, and for all purposes become a part of, the firemen's relief and pension fund of the city or town, and the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund of the city or town shall operate the firemen's relief and pension fund of the district as a part of the fund of the city or town and shall assume all obligations and assets of the district fund as its own.

The board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund of the merging district shall cease to exist upon the completion of the transfer and merger.

The board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund of any fire protection district formed pursuant to §§ 14-284-101 — 14-284-121 may expend moneys from the firemen's relief and pension fund for the purpose of purchasing and paying the premiums on group insurance covering the members of the fire department of the district against accidental injury or death occurring in the line of duty.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 431, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5; 1965, No. 462, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 20-918 — 20-922; Acts 2013, No. 41, § 31; 2015, No. 1165, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “is eligible” for “shall be eligible” in (a); substituted “§ 24-11-801 et seq.” for “§§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809 — 24-11-811, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-821” in (b)(1), (b)(2) and (d)(1); in (b)(2), deleted the first sentence and inserted “be operated in the same manner”; in (c)(2)(A), substituted “Six percent (6%)” for “One percent (1%)” and “full-paid firefighter and each part-paid firefighter” for “member”; and substituted “firemen's relief and pension fund” for “fund” in (d)(1).

The 2015 amendment inserted “board of” in (a).

Cross References.

Rate credit on risks in rural fire protection districts, § 23-88-103.

24-11-825. Pensions for volunteer firefighters.

Upon termination of volunteer firefighter service with all Arkansas fire departments, a firefighter whose covered volunteer employment has been with more than one (1) Arkansas fire department shall receive a pension based upon the volunteer service if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

His or her volunteer service with his or her last employing fire department was for five (5) or more consecutive years and ended with his or her retirement;

Previous volunteer service with each other fire department shall have been:

For five (5) or more consecutive years;

Covered by a local fire pension plan established by this subchapter; and

Requested in writing for service credit by the retiring firefighter;

Upon receipt of the request pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, each previous employing fire department shall certify the amount of the previous volunteer service to the local fire pension plan of the last employing fire department. The last local fire pension plan shall then cause to have performed at its expense an actuarial valuation to determine the single sum present value of the previous volunteer service being credited, based upon the benefit program the previous local fire pension plan had in effect at the time the firefighter terminated such previous service. The actuarial valuation shall be performed by the actuary of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board. The dollar amount of the present value shall be promptly certified to the previous plan, which shall promptly pay that amount to the last pension plan;

No more than one (1) year of service shall be credited any firefighter for all covered employment rendered by him or her in any one (1) year, nor shall any firefighter be given credited service for any time he or she was not an active firefighter;

The firefighter shall cause to be transferred from each previous pension plan to the last pension plan the amount of his or her accumulated employee contributions with each previous pension plan; and

The total of all service to be credited as described in this subsection must be at least twenty (20) years.

The pension payable from the last pension plan shall be based upon the benefit program in effect for the last employing fire department. However, any pension fund that did not meet the actuarial standards for soundness as determined by the most recent actuarial valuation performed on the fund by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall not transfer assets to another local pension fund for prior service of a former volunteer member, nor shall any volunteer member be given credited service time for which no transfer of assets is made.

Upon a member's termination of volunteer firefighter service with all Arkansas departments for a period of not less than ninety (90) days, the member may return to volunteer service with an employer covered by a firemen's relief and pension fund and may continue to draw the retiree's pension if the retiree desires to return to volunteer service with an employer covered by a pension fund and voluntarily agrees to sign a waiver to earning any further service credit in any firefighter-related pension fund.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 111, § 1; 2003, No. 1733, § 2.

24-11-826. Additional benefits for certain firefighters hired prior to January 1, 1983 — Definition.

Beginning July 1, 1987, in addition to the monthly pension benefits as set forth in §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-812 — 24-11-815, 24-11-818, and 24-11-820, for those firefighters hired prior to January 1, 1983, and who continue to work beyond their twenty-fifth year, the member of a firemen’s relief and pension fund shall receive at age sixty (60) and thereafter a benefit on the amount equal to one and one-fourth percent (1.25%) of final salary attached to the rank which he or she held in the department preceding the date of retirement multiplied by the number of years of service in excess of twenty-five (25) years, up to a maximum total benefit of seventy-five percent (75%) of final salary, provided that the maximum seventy-five percent (75%) of final salary no longer applies to benefits payable on April 30, 1991, and thereafter to persons retiring henceforth and to those persons who retired on or after July 1, 1987.

However, in no case shall the benefit payment exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final salary.

This benefit shall be payable to the member only and not to surviving spouses or dependent children.

For the purposes of this section, “salary” means recurring pays that are received for a regularly scheduled workweek and does not include, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payments for unused accrued sick leave or annual leave or the cash value of any nonrecurring or unusual remuneration.

The term “salary” may include the payments to those firefighters under this section for unused accrued sick leave not to exceed ninety (90) workdays recorded on the records of the city or town as of the firefighter's date of retirement if the municipality agrees by ordinance to make adequate contributions to the fund to cover the additional costs for the benefits from the increased salary and the fund is judged by an actuarial determination to be actuarially sound.

The board of trustees of a firemen’s relief and pension fund shall determine the actuarial costs of the payments for the unused accrued sick leave to the fund.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 878, § 1; 1991, No. 844, § 2; 1993, No. 546, § 4; 2013, No. 41, § 32; 2015, No. 1165, § 7.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 502, § 1 provided:

“(a) Beginning July 1, 1987, in addition to the monthly pension benefits as set forth in §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-810, 24-11-812 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-821, for those fire fighters hired prior to January 1, 1983, and who continue to work beyond their twenty-fifth year, the member shall receive at age sixty (60) years and thereafter a benefit on the amount equal to one and one-fourth percent (1.25%) of final salary attached to the rank which he may have held in the department preceding the date of retirement multiplied by the number of years of service in excess of twenty-five (25) years, up to a maximum total benefit of seventy-five percent (75%) of final salary, provided that the maximum seventy-five percent (75%) of final salary shall no longer apply to benefits payable on April 30, 1991, and thereafter to persons retiring henceforth and to those persons who retired on or after July 1, 1987. However, in no case shall the benefit payment exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final salary.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 878, § 1, is also codified as § 24-11-432.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “firefighters” for “fire fighters” in the section heading and throughout the section; in (a), deleted “24-11-810” following “24-11-809” and “may have” preceding “held in the department”; and substituted “firefighter's” for “fire fighter's” in (c)(2)(A).

The 2015 amendment redesignated (a) as (a)(1) and (2); in (a)(1), deleted “and 24-11-821” following “24-11-820”, inserted “of a firemen’s relief and pension fund”, and substituted “no longer applies” for “shall no longer apply”; in (c)(1), substituted “does not include” for “shall not include” and “remuneration” for “remunerations”; substituted “if the municipality” for “provided the municipality” in (c)(2)(A); and inserted “of a firemen’s relief and pension fund” in (c)(2)(B).

24-11-827. Retired member returning to active status.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, should an age or service retirant return March 1, 1986, or later to employment in a position covered by the firemen's relief and pension fund from which he or she retired, no pension payments shall be paid to him or her for the period of the reemployment, and he or she shall make member contributions to the firemen's relief and pension fund as if he or she were an active member during the reemployment.

If reemployment terminates before the retirant has rendered sufficient reemployment to accumulate at least three (3) years of credited service had he or she been an active member during the reemployment, the payment of his or her pension shall resume upon termination, under the form of payment in force at the beginning of reemployment and in an amount as it would be had he or she not been reemployed.

If reemployment continues until the retirant has rendered sufficient reemployment to accumulate at least three (3) years of credited service, then effective upon completion of reemployment, his or her retirement shall be recalculated to account for the additional accrued service credit and salary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 429, § 1; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 2; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 76, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 33; 2015, No. 1165, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), substituted “the” for “such” twice and “shall make member” for “may make member”; redesignated (b)(1) as (b) and deleted (b)(2); in (b), substituted “the reemployment” for “such reemployment” and deleted “such” preceding “termination”; and rewrote (c).

The 2015 amendment substituted “firemen’s relief and pension fund” for “system” near the end of (a).

24-11-828. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning credit for service as police officer in cities between 7,400 and 7,700, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 554, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 821, § 1.

24-11-829. Increase in surviving spouse benefits.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, the board of trustees of any municipal firemen's relief and pension fund for which a full one-mill tax is levied and which received in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from premium tax funds during the most recent year shall increase surviving spouse benefits payable from the firemen's relief and pension fund to the amount of the pension received by the retired firefighter at the time of his or her death, or the amount of the pension to which the member would have been entitled on the day he or she died had he or she been retired.

The board shall direct a monthly pension in the increased amount effective on or before August 1, 1993.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 480, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 34.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “firefighter” for “fire fighter” in (a).